Mississippi, session 2026, HB4127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Tameral Johnson of DeSoto County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Embezzlement in DeSoto County, Mississippi, for which she was sentenced on August 1, 2012, to serve one (1) year in the Intensive Supervision Program and five (5) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released from probation on December 22, 2015, and discharged on December 20, 2020.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.